Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1090.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Mushrooms are the transitory, fruiting VISIBLE bodies of fungi, ancient organisms that help sustain life on Earth in a variety of ways.(2) This Commonwealth is home to more than 7,400 species of fungi.(3) Mushrooms are an essential part of a healthy ecosystem, decomposing organic matter and redistributing nutrients needed for healthy soil.(4) Mushrooms provide a pathway for environmental protections, including use in water purification and carbon absorption.<--1234567891011121314151617 (5) Mushrooms are foraged and cultivated for consumption and medicinal use.(6) As its common name implies, the Hemlock Varnish Shelf is a native mushroom closely associated with the State tree of Pennsylvania, the Eastern Hemlock (Tsuga canadensis), and is widely distributed throughout this Commonwealth.(7) Unlike many mushrooms, the Hemlock Varnish Shelf is easy to identify and is often visible year-round.(8) A type of reishi mushroom, the Hemlock Varnish Shelf is valued for its medicinal properties, including use as an anti-inflammatory and antioxidant, and to support regulation of the immune system.(9) Naming the Hemlock Varnish Shelf as the official State mushroom of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania will promote appreciation, education and the study of mushrooms in this State.Section 2. Official State mushroom.The Hemlock Varnish Shelf is hereby designated as the official State mushroom of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.Section 3. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1090PN3552 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021